Texas, session 892, HB248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 25.1101(b), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  Hidalgo County has the following statutory probate courts: (1)  [one statutory probate court, the] Probate Court No. 1 of Hidalgo County; and (2)  Probate Court No. 2 of Hidalgo County. SECTION 2.  Section 25.1102(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Section 25.0003 and other law, a county court at law in Hidalgo County has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in: (1)  family law cases and proceedings; and (2)  civil cases [in which the matter in controversy does not exceed $750,000, excluding interest, statutory or punitive damages and penalties, and attorney's fees and costs, as alleged on the page of the petition]. SECTION 3.  On the effective date of this Act: (1)  Probate Court No. 2 of Hidalgo County is created; and (2)  the Probate Court of Hidalgo County is redesignated as Probate Court No. 1 of Hidalgo County. SECTION 4.  Section 25.1102(a), Government Code, as amended by this Act, applies only to an action filed in a county court at law in Hidalgo County on or after the effective date of this Act.  An action filed in a county court at law in Hidalgo County before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the action was filed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 5.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.